Utah statutes.
76-6-301.   Robbery.
(1)  A person commits robbery if:
(a)  the person unlawfully and intentionally takes or attempts to take
personal property in the possession of another from his person, or immediate
presence, against his will, by means of force or fear, and with a purpose or
intent to deprive the person permanently or temporarily of the personal
property; or
(b)  the person intentionally or knowingly uses force or fear of immediate
force against another in the course of committing a theft or wrongful
appropriation.
(2)  An act is considered to be "in the course of committing a theft or
wrongful appropriation" if it occurs:
(a)  in the course of an attempt to commit theft or wrongful appropriation;
(b)  in the commission of theft or wrongful appropriation; or
(c)  in the immediate flight after the attempt or commission.
(3)  Robbery is a felony of the second degree.
